Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HERMANN THE GERMAN STATUE SUPPORTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of New Ulm to reconstruct the platform, base, and supporting structure of the Hermann the German monument in New Ulm. This appropriation may also be used to demolish the old platform, base, and supporting structure. new text end